Utah statutes.
40-8-22.   Division cooperation -- Agreements.

(1) The division shall cooperate with other state agencies, local governmental bodies, agencies of the federal government, and appropriate private interest in the furtherance of the purposes of this act.

(2)  The division is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with these agencies, as may be approved by the board, in furtherance of the purposes of this act and may accept or commit funds in connection thereto as may be appropriated or otherwise provided for the purpose and as specifically approved by the board, except that such actions shall not result in any delegation of powers, responsibility, or authority conferred upon the board or division by this act.

